District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.30

Assignment of claim.

An assignment of a claim for compensation under this subchapter is void. Compensation and claims for compensation are exempt from claims of creditors.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2330, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-624.30.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.30.